Washington statutes.
RCW 36.73.067

Vehicle fee rebate program—Low-income individuals—Report to legislature.

(1) A district that: (a) Includes a city with a population of five hundred thousand persons or more; and (b) imposes a vehicle fee under RCW 36.73.040(3)(b), sales and use taxes under RCW 36.73.040(3)(a), or tolls under RCW 36.73.040(3)(d), may establish a rebate program for the purposes of providing rebates of up to forty percent of the actual fee, tax, or toll paid by a low-income individual.

(2) Funds collected from a vehicle fee under RCW 36.73.040(3)(b), sales and use tax under RCW 36.73.040(3)(a) or tolls under RCW 36.73.040(3)(d) may be used for a rebate program established under this section.

(3) A district that establishes a rebate program is responsible for the development and administration of the program and all functions and costs associated with the rebate program.

(4) A district that establishes a rebate program under this section must report back to the legislature two years after the program takes effect. The report must include, but is not limited to, a detailed description of the structure of the program, the average rebate, the total amount of rebates issued, and the number of people that received rebates.

[ 2012 c 152 s 2.]